Tennessee, session 114, SB0684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-105(c), is amended by deleting
"thirty (30) days" and substituting instead "forty-five (45) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0684
001313
- 1 -